Washington statutes.
RCW 4.60.050

Judgment by confession without suit.

A judgment by confession may be entered without action, either for money due or to become due, or to secure any person against contingent liability on behalf of the defendant, or both, in the manner prescribed by this chapter.

[Code 1881 s 295; 1877 p 60 s 299; 1869 p 73 s 297; RRS s 417.]